District of Columbia statutes.
31-2602.18

Repealed

Investment of capital, assets and surplus.

Repealed.

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 409, ch. 93, title VI, § 18
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(q), 44 DCR 1730
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330
1981 Ed., § 35-1418.
1973 Ed., § 35-1118.
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2602.01.